Wyoming, session 2026, SF0012.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 19-9-403 by creating a new subsection
(g) is amended to read:
19-9-403. Pay and allowances of officers and enlisted
persons in active state service and state active duty;
worker's compensation coverage for national guard members;
no pension denied by reason of service.
(g) There is created the Wyoming national guard
member reenlistment and extension program. The military
department shall establish and administer this program for
the purpose of providing reenlistment and extension bonuses
to members of the Wyoming national guard to increase the
Wyoming national guard's strength in accordance with the
following:
(i) The military department may provide a
reenlistment or extension bonus to a Wyoming national guard
member meeting all of the following requirements:
(A) The Wyoming national guard member
satisfies the Wyoming national guard's reenlistment or
extension eligibility criteria;
(B) The Wyoming national guard member
reenlists or extends with the Wyoming national guard for
not less than three (3) years; and
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0012
ENROLLED ACT NO. 25, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(C) The Wyoming national guard member
satisfies any other requirements specified by the military
department.
(ii) Upon satisfaction of the requirements under
paragraph (i) of this subsection and to the extent
sufficient funds are available, the military department
shall distribute a reenlistment or extension bonus of not
more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) to the
reenlisting or extending Wyoming national guard member;
(iii) Beginning November 1, 2026 and annually
every November 1 thereafter, the military department shall
report to the joint transportation, highways and military
affairs interim committee on the Wyoming national guard
member reenlistment and extension program. The report shall
include the following:
(A) The number of Wyoming national guard
members who reenlisted or extended;
(B) The average number of years the Wyoming
national guard members reenlisted or extended;
(C) The amounts of reenlistment and
extension bonuses paid;
(D) The total number of members in the
Wyoming national guard including the percentage of increase
or decrease in the total number of members in the Wyoming
national guard from the previous year;
(E) Any recommended legislation.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0012
ENROLLED ACT NO. 25, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. There is appropriated one million dollars
($1,000,000.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming
military department for purposes of funding the Wyoming
national guard member reenlistment and extension program as
created by this act. This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the standard budget for
the Wyoming military department for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 3. The Wyoming military department shall
promulgate rules necessary to administer the Wyoming
national guard member reenlistment and extension program
created by this act.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0012
ENROLLED ACT NO. 25, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4